Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2205
Professional services that may be rendered.

A professional corporation shall render only one type of professional service and such services as may be ancillary thereto and shall not engage in any other profession. No corporation organized and incorporated under the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act may render professional services except through its officers, employees, and agents who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state. This section shall not be interpreted to include in the term employee, as used in the act, clerks, secretaries, bookkeepers, technicians, and other assistants who are not usually and ordinarily considered by custom and practice to be rendering professional services to the public for which a license or other legal authorization is required.

A professional corporation may own real and personal property necessary or appropriate for rendering the type of professional services it was organized to render and may invest its funds in real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds, and any other type of investments.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 5, p. 556;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 57.